tr: Kılıf malzemesi: Akrilik; Bambu; Tuval; Mantar; Pamuk; Kot; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Keçe; Flanel; Yapağı; Kürk; Kenevir; Jüt; Lateks; Deri; Keten; Likra; Ağ; Modal; Tiftik kumaş; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Hint kamışı; Kauçuk; Sentetik; Muşamba; Dimi; Vinil; Viskon; Yünlüler; Diğer
fi: Päällysmateriaali: Akryyli; Bambu; Kanvaasi; Korkki; Puuvilla; Denim; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Huopa; Flanneli; Fleece; Turkis; Hamppu; Juutti; Lateksi; Nahka; Pellava; Lycra; Verkko; Modaali; Mohair; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Rottinki; Kumi; Synteettinen; Pressu; Tvilli; Vinyyli; Viskoosi; Villa; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal navlake: Akril; Bambus; Platno; Pluto; Pamuk; Traper; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Filc; Flanel; Flis; Krzno; Konoplja; Juta; Lateks; Koža; Lan; Likra; Mrežica; Modal; Moher; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Ratan; Guma; Sintetika; Cerada; Keper; Vinil; Viskoza; Vuna; Ostalo
pl: Materiał pokrycia: Akryl; Bambus; Płótno; Korek; Bawełna; Drelich; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Filc; Flanela; Polar; Futrzany; Konopie; Juta; Lateks; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Lycra; Siatka; Modalny; Moher; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Rattan; Guma; Syntetyczne; Plandeka; Diagonalna; Winyl; Wiskoza; Wełna; Pozostałe
el: Υλικό καλύμματος: Ακρυλικό; Μπαμπού; Καμβάς; Φελλός; Βαμβάκι; Ντένιμ; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Φανελένιο ύφασμα; Φλις; Γούνα; Καννάβι; Γιούτα; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Λινό; Λύκρα; Πλέγμα; Μοντάλ; Μοχέρ; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Ρατάν; Καουτσούκ; Συνθετικό; Μουσαμάς; Twill; Βινύλιο; Βισκόζη; Μαλλί; Άλλο
zh-TW: 外殼材質: 壓克力; 竹子; 帆布; 軟木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 毛氈; 絨布; 刷毛布; 皮草; 大麻; 黃麻; 乳膠; 皮製; 亞麻; 萊卡; 網布; 莫代爾; 馬海毛; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 藤; 橡膠; 合成; 篷布; 斜紋布; 乙烯基; 黏膠; 羊毛; 其他
th: วัสดุหุ้ม: อะคริลิก; ไผ่; ผ้าใบ; ต้นคอร์ก; สำลี; ผ้าเดนิม; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าขนแกะ; Fur; กัญชง; ใยปอ; ยางพารา; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ผ้าไลครา; ตาข่าย; ผ้าโมดาล; ขนโมแฮร์; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; หวาย; ยาง; สังเคราะห์; ผ้าใบกันน้ำ; ผ้าทวิล; ไวนิล; เส้นใยเรยอน; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Material husă: Acrilic; Bambus; Pânză; Plută; Bumbac; Denim; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Flanelă; Polar; Blană; Cânepă; Iută; Latex; Piele; In; Lycra; Plasă; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Ratan; Cauciuc; Sintetic; Prelată; Twill; Vinil; Viscoză; Lână; Altele
pt-PT: Material da cobertura: Acrílico; Bambu; Tela; Cortiça; Algodão; Ganga; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Feltro; Flanela; Velo; Pele; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Pele; Linho; Licra; Rede; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Ratim; Borracha; Sintético; Lona; Ligamento sarja; Vinil; Viscose; Lã; Outro
ko: 커버 소재: 아크릴; 대나무; 캔버스; 코르크; 면; 데님; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 플란넬; 플리스; 모피; 대마; 주트; 라텍스; 가죽; 린넨; 라이크라; 메쉬; 모달; 모헤어; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 등나무; 고무; 인조; 타포린; 능직; 비닐; 비스코스; 울; 기타
ja: カバーの素材: アクリル; バンブー; キャンバス; コルク; コットン; デニム; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フェルト; フランネル; フリース; 毛皮; 麻; ジュート; ラテックス; レザー; リネン; Lycra; メッシュ; モーダル; モヘア; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; 籐; ゴム; 合成品; 防水シート; ツイル; ビニール; ビスコース; ウール; その他
cs: Materiál potahu/obalu: Akrylové; Bambus; Plátno; Korek; Bavlna; Džínovina; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Flanel; Flís; Srst; Konopí; Juta; Latex; Kůže; Len; Lycra; Síťovina; Modal; Mohér; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Ratan; Guma; Syntetické; Celtovina; Kepr; Vinylové; Viskóza; Vlna; Jiné
ru: Материал покрывающей части: Акрил; Бамбук; Холщовая ткань; Пробка; Хлопок; Деним; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Фланель; Флис; Мех; Конопля; Джут; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Лайкра; Сетка; Модал; Мохер; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Ротанг; Резина; Синтетика; Брезент; Твил; Винил; Вискоза; Шерсть; Другое
es: Material de la cubierta: Acrílico; Bambú; Lienzo; Corcho; Algodón; Vaquera; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Franela; Vellón; Piel; Cáñamo; Yute; Látex; Cuero; Lino; Licra; Malla; Modal; Mohair; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Ratán; Goma; Sintético; Lona; Sarga; Vinilo; Viscosa; Lana; Otros
nb: Dekkmateriale: Akryl; Bambus; Lerret; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Filt; Flanell; Fleece; Pels; Hamp; Jute; Lateks; Skinn; Lin; Lycra; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rotting; Gummi; Syntetisk; Tarpaulin; Twill; Vinyl; Viskose; Ull; Annen
de: Bezugsmaterial: Acryl; Bambus; Leinwand; Kork; Baumwolle; Denim; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Filz; Flanell; Vlies; Fell; Hanf; Jute; Latex; Leder; Leinen; Lycra; Netz; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Synthetisch; Plane; Köper; Vinyl; Viskose; Wolle; Sonstiges
vi: Vật liệu phủ: Acrylic; Tre; Toan; Thảm gỗ bần; Vải bông; Bò; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ; Nỉ mỏng; Nỉ cào; Lông thú; Cây gai dầu; Sợi đay; Mủ cao su; Da; Lanh; Lycra; Lưới; Phương thức; Len mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Cây mây; Cao su; Tổng hợp; Tarpaulin; Vải twill; Nhựa vinyl; Vải viscose; Len; Khác
hu: Tartó anyaga: Akril; Bambusz; Vászon; Parafa; Pamutszövet; Farmer; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Filc; Flanel; Gyapjú; Szőrme; Kender; Juta; Latex; Bőr; Lenvászon; Lycra; Háló; Modál; Moher; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Rattan; Gumi; Szintetikus; Vitorlavászon; Twill; Vinil; Viszkóz; Gyapjú; Egyéb
da: Covermateriale: Akryl; Bambus; Lærred; Kork; Bomuld; Denim; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Flannel; Fleece; Pels; Hamp; Jute; Latex; Læder; Linned; Lycra; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Syntetisk; Presenning; Twill; Vinyl; Viskose; Uld; Andet
en: Cover material: Acrylic; Bamboo; Canvas; Cork; Cotton; Denim; Faux fur; Faux leather; Felt; Flannel; Fleece; Fur; Hemp; Jute; Latex; Leather; Linen; Lycra; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rattan; Rubber; Synthetic; Tarpaulin; Twill; Vinyl; Viscose; Wool; Other
bg-BG: Материал на покривалото: Акрил; Бамбук; Брезент; Корк; Памук; Деним; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Бархет; Полар; Козина; Коноп; Юта; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Ликра; Мрежа; Модал; Мохер; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Ратан; Каучук; Синтетичен; Брезент; Кепър; Винил; Вискоза; Вълна; Други
fr: Matériau de couverture: Acrylique; Bambou; Toiles; Liège; Coton; Jean; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Feutre; Flanelle; Polaire; Fourrure; Chanvre; Jute; Latex; Cuir; Lin; Lycra; A mailles; Modal; Mohair; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Rattan; Caoutchouc; Synthétique; Tarpaulin; Twill; Vinyl; Viscose; Laine; Autre
nl: Omslagmateriaal: Acryl; Bamboe; Canvas; Kurk; Katoen; Denim; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Vilt; Flanel; Fleece; Bont; Hennep; Jute; Latex; Leer; Linnen; Lycra; Gaas; Modal; Mohair; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Rotan; Rubber; Synthetisch; Dekzeil; Keper; Vinyl; Viscose; Wol; Andere
sv: Skyddsmaterial: Akryl; Bambu; Kanvas; Kork; Bomull; Denim; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Filt; Flanell; Fleece; Päls; Hampa; Jute; Latex; Läder; Linne; Lykra; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Rattan; Gummi; Syntetisk; Presenning; Twill; Vinyl; Viskos; Ylle; Annat
pt-BR: Material da capa: Acrílico; Bambu; Tela; Cortiça; Algodão; Jeans; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Sentido; Flanela; Lã; Pele; Cânhamo; Juta; Látex; Couro; Linho; Lycra; Malha; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Rattan; Borracha; Sintético; Encerado; Sarja; Vinil; Viscose; Lã; Outro
it: Materiale del rivestimento: Acrilico; Bamboo; Tela; Sughero; Cotone; Denim; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Feltro; Flanella; Felpa; Pelliccia; Canapa; Iuta; Lattice; Pelle; Lino; Lycra; Mesh; Modal; Mohair; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Rattan; Gomma; Sintetico; Tela cerata; Twill; Vinile; Viscosa; Lana; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál poťahu: Akryl; Bambus; Plátno; Korok; Bavlna; Denim; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Flanel; Flís; Kožušina; Konope; Juta; Latex; Koža; Ľan; Lycra; Sieťovina; Modálny; Mohér; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Ratan; Guma; Syntetický; Plachta; Keper; Vinyl; Viskóza; Vlna; Iné
zh-CN: 封盖材料: 丙烯酸; 竹子; 画布; 软木; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 法兰绒; 羊毛; 毛皮围巾; 麻; 黄麻; 乳胶; 皮革; 亚麻; 莱卡; 网状; 莫代尔; 马海毛; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 藤条; 橡胶; 合成; 防水油布; 斜纹布; 乙烯基贴纸; 纤维胶; 羊毛; 其他
sl-SI: Material prevleke: Akril; Bambus; Platno; Pluta; Bombaž; Džins; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Filc; Flanela; Flis; Krzno; Konoplja; Juta; Latex; Usnje; Lan; Lycra; Mreža; Modal; Moher; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Ratan; Guma; Sintetika; Ponjava; Twill; Vinil; Viskoza; Volna; Drugo
lt-LT: Užtiesalo medžiaga: Akrilas; Bambukas; Drobė; Kamštis; Medvilnė; Džinsinis audinys; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Flanelė; Flisas; Kailis; Kanapių pluoštas; Džiutas; Lateksas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Laikra; Tinklelis; Modalas; Mohera; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Ratanas; Kaučiukas; Sintetika; Brezentas; Tvilas; Vinilas; Viskozė; Vilna; Kita